Rhode Island statutes. Title 1 Aeronautics
Chapter 7 The Permanent Air Quality Monitoring Act

1-7-1.
Long-term air-quality-monitoring program.

The Rhode Island airport corporation (RIAC) shall design, acquire, install, operate, and maintain a long-term air-quality-monitoring program in the vicinity of Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport. The corporation may hire a consultant to perform these tasks.

The monitoring program shall provide for the monitoring of all of the following:

Particulate matter, including only particles less than 0.1 microns, and black carbon.

[Deleted by P.L. 2017, ch. 220, § 1 and P.L. 2017, ch. 320, § 1.]

[Deleted by P.L. 2017, ch. 220, § 1 and P.L. 2017, ch. 320, § 1.]

The design of the monitoring program shall:

Include an implementation schedule for the components of the monitoring program set forth in subsection (b); and

Assure the quality and meaningfulness of the monitoring data; and

Be set forth in a draft work plan developed, in consultation with the department of environmental management and the department of health.

The consultation with the department of environmental management and the department of health shall include, but not be limited to:

Ensuring that peer review is employed in the development of an air-quality-monitoring strategy;

Providing the corporation with unbiased reviews of current, validated scientific knowledge relevant to air-quality monitoring and public health impacts;

Assisting with the review of work plans and reports;

Evaluating and comparing the corporation’s proposed methodologies, quality assurance procedures and monitoring criteria, with other relevant monitoring efforts mandated by either state or federal law in order to ensure consistency and comparability among the methodologies and criteria.

The draft work plan and the final work plan shall describe and justify with reasonable specificity all significant aspects of the monitoring program, including, but not limited to: quality assurance procedures and a description and justification of the number, type, and location of the ambient air-quality monitors to be installed as part of the long-term monitoring program. The ambient air-quality monitors shall be set up in a network that shall include at least four (4) monitoring sites and shall be designed to measure air-quality impacts from airport operations, including those associated with planes operating on the extended runway and on neighborhoods adjacent to the airport facility, as well as at the Winslow Park playing fields.

Notwithstanding the consultation requirement, the draft work plan shall be submitted to the department of environmental management and the department of health within thirty (30) days of the effective date of this section for review and comment, pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42. The departments shall provide comments within thirty (30) days of receipt of the draft work plan. Following the departments’ review and comment period, the draft work plan shall be made available for review and comment by members of the general public, and the air-quality-monitoring public advisory committee, established by this chapter, pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42. Adoption of the final work plan by the corporation shall be in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42. The final work plan shall be submitted to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate by the corporation no later than October 30, 2007.

The final work plan and all revised final work plans shall include a reasonable evaluation of funding sources, such as federal grants, that may be available to the corporation to cover some or all of the costs of the air-quality monitoring.

Amendments to the final work plan may be proposed by the corporation in consultation with the department of environmental management and the department of health on or before March 30, 2009, and every March 30, thereafter. Amendments to the final work plan may also be proposed by the department of environmental management, the department of health, and/or the air-quality-monitoring public advisory committee on or before January 31, 2009, and every January 31, thereafter. Any proposed amendments to the final work plan shall be available for review and comment by members of the general public, and the air-quality-monitoring public advisory committee established by this chapter, pursuant to chapter 35 of title 42. The purposes of proposed amendments to the final work plan are: (1) To allow the corporation, in consultation with the department of environmental management and the department of health, to consider any adaptations that may be indicated by the data collected from the previous year, including whether new monitoring technologies, methodologies, or criteria are necessary; and (2) To make necessary adjustments to the program based on changes to state or federal regulations, or both. Any proposed amendments to the final work plan shall be incorporated into a “revised [as of this date] final work plan” document, upon approval of the corporation, and shall be submitted to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate by the corporation no later than January 1 of each year.

Long-term air-quality monitors will be procured and in effect by December 30, 2007. Interim monitoring shall be performed until such time as the long-term monitoring program is in place, and the use of all data generated therefrom shall conform with the reporting requirements set forth in §

1-7-6(b)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 486, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 190, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 198, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 5, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 5, effective June 1, 2021.

1-7-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares as follows:

Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport is located in a densely populated, primarily residential area of the city of Warwick.

Many of the airport operations and activities result in emissions of a number of air pollutants that may be harmful to public health.

Emissions of concern include, but are not limited to, those associated with “take-off” and “landing” activities of aircraft and emissions associated with the use of diesel engine ground support equipment.

A long-term air-quality monitoring program is necessary to collect the data needed to evaluate the impact of the airport emissions on air quality and public health.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 190, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 198, § 2; P.L. 2021, ch. 32, § 5, effective June 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 36, § 5, effective June 1, 2021.

1-7-3.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases, for the purposes of this chapter, have the following meanings:

“Corporation” means the Rhode Island airport corporation as established in §

1-2-1.1

.

“Monitoring program” means the long-term, air-quality monitoring program as established by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 190, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 198, § 2.

1-7-4.
Air quality monitoring public advisory committee.

An “air quality monitoring public advisory committee” shall be established to advise the corporation on the development and implementation of the long-term, air-quality monitoring program, and the preparation of annual work plans. The public advisory committee shall be made up of at least nine (9) public members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. In making those appointments, the governor shall give due consideration to include representatives from environmental advocacy organizations, health advocacy organizations, economic advocacy organizations, neighborhood organizations, academic institutions, and the city of Warwick. Members of the public advisory committee shall serve for terms of two (2) years. The governor shall convene the public advisory committee with sufficient time to enable it to perform its responsibilities under this chapter. The members of the public advisory committee shall receive no compensation for their services to the committee. The public advisory committee shall elect annually from among their members a chair, a vice chair, and any other officers it deems appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 190, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 198, § 2.

1-7-5.
Health study.

The corporation shall provide the department of health with funding in an amount not to exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), half to be paid in fiscal year 2008 and the other half to be paid in fiscal year 2009, which funds the department of health will use for an independent health study (the “study” or the “health study”) developed in consultation with the department of environmental management and the air-quality monitoring public advisory committee. The purpose of the study will be to determine whether and to what extent, air pollution generated by airport activities affects the health of area residents based, to the extent feasible, on established health benchmarks.

The study shall use the data collected from the first year of long-term, air-quality monitoring at the airport described in the previous sections to evaluate potential public health implications of emissions based, to the extent feasible, on established health benchmarks, and shall be completed and submitted to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate no later than May 30, 2009.

The corporation, the department of health, and the city of Warwick shall publish technical reports and scientific publications that resulted from this health study on their respective websites no later than July 31, 2019, and shall maintain them on their respective websites for at least five (5) years thereafter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 190, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 198, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 249, § 1.

1-7-6.
Reporting.

The corporation shall provide the department of environmental management with an inventory of greenhouse gas pollutants, including, but not limited to, carbon dioxide and methane, and an annual inventory of sulfur dioxide, nitrogen oxides, and carbon monoxide. The inventories of data generated in the prior calendar year shall be reported to the department of environmental management on or before March 30, 2009, and every March 30 thereafter.

Data generated from the permanent air-quality monitors shall be reported to the department of environmental management, the department of health, and to the city of Warwick on at least a quarterly basis and shall be used by the departments to continuously augment and update air-quality-monitoring studies conducted by the departments. The corporation shall publish the data on its website within thirty (30) calendar days of the end of the quarter.

The department of health shall prepare an annual report that shall contain the department’s findings, analysis, conclusions, and recommendations resulting from the data generated by and from the permanent air-quality monitors (the “monitors”), as well as a summary of the data collected from the monitors. The first such report shall be due on or before July 31, 2017, and on or before July 31 in 2018, 2019, and for any further year thereafter during which data is collected and reported pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b). Copies of these reports shall be provided by the required dates to the speaker of the house, the president of the senate, the office of the governor, the office of the attorney general, the airport corporation, and the offices of the mayor and the city council of the city of Warwick. The department of health, the airport corporation, and the city of Warwick shall publish these reports on their respective websites within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt of the reports.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 190, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 198, § 2; P.L. 2017, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 249, § 1.

1-7-7.
Regulation and enforcement — Powers of the department of health and the department of environmental management.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall diminish or abrogate the powers granted to the department of environmental management and the department of health pursuant to chapters 23 and 1 of title 23 as amended, respectively.

Any facilities under the jurisdiction of the corporation shall be subject, as otherwise provided in law, to the regulatory and enforcement requirements of the department of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 190, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 198, § 2.

1-7-8.
Violations — Sanctions — Injunctive relief.

Willful noncompliance of this chapter that impairs the monitoring program herein established shall be considered a violation of a program requirement as described in §

23-23-14

.

The attorney general of the state shall have the power to bring an action in the name of the state, in any court of competent jurisdiction, for restraining orders and injunctive relief to restrain and enjoin willful noncompliance of this chapter or for specific performance of the obligations of the corporation under this chapter.

Such willful noncompliance shall be punishable by a penalty as provided for in §

23-23-14

(a).

Proceedings under this chapter shall be instituted and prosecuted by the attorney general. The superior court shall have the jurisdiction in equity to enforce the provisions of this chapter and any rules or regulations of the corporation under the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 190, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 198, § 2.

1-7-9.
Monitoring actions required and compliance — Sunset provision.

On or before January 31, 2017, and on or before January 31, 2018, and January 31, 2019, thereafter, the department of environmental management, the department of health, and the attorney general shall submit to the governor, the speaker of the house, and the president of the senate, recommendations as to the continuation of the air monitoring required in this act.

Unless extended by the general assembly, the corporation’s obligation to operate and maintain the air monitoring system will cease on July 31, 2023; provided, this sunset date shall be dependent upon the corporation undertaking and completing the following actions prior to July 31, 2023:

As part of the long-term air-quality monitoring program, ambient air-quality monitors shall be set up in a network that shall include at least four (4) monitoring sites in the area of and surrounding Rhode Island T.F. Green International Airport. These monitors shall be designed, placed, and maintained so as to measure air-quality impacts from airport operations, including those impacts associated with planes operating on the extended runway and on neighborhoods adjacent to the airport facility, and at the Winslow Park playing fields. In addition to the quarterly summary reports prepared by the corporation based on this data, the corporation shall compile at least twenty (20) months of complete air quality monitoring data from these monitors and submit that data to the department of health prior to May 1, 2023, pursuant to §

1-7-6

; and

The corporation shall comply with all other reporting and publishing requirements set forth in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 190, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 198, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 245, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 265, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 225, § 1, effective July 8, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 326, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.